dicts/de_DE-1901-ooe/de_DE_OLDSPELL.aff
# for comparative forms of adjectives: 
SFX C Y 97                                                    
SFX C   0       ere        [^elr]                                # neu > neuere 
SFX C   0       erer       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       eren       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       erem       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       eres       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       re         e                                     # prüde > prüdere 
SFX C   0       rer        e     
SFX C   0       ren        e     
SFX C   0       rem        e     
SFX C   0       res        e     
SFX C   0       ere        [^e][lr]                              # schmal > schmale 
SFX C   0       erer       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   0       eren       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   0       erem       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   0       eres       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   el      lere       el                                    # eitel > eitlere
SFX C   el      lerer      el
SFX C   el      leren      el
SFX C   el      lerem      el
SFX C   el      leres      el
SFX C   er      rere       uer                                   # teuer > teurere 
SFX C   er      rerer      uer   
SFX C   er      reren      uer   
SFX C   er      rerem      uer   
SFX C   er      reres      uer   
SFX C   0       ere        [^u]er                                # schwer > schwerere 
SFX C   0       erer       [^u]er        
SFX C   0       eren       [^u]er        
SFX C   0       erem       [^u]er        
SFX C   0       eres       [^u]er        
SFX C   lig     eligere    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adeligere 
SFX C   lig     eligerer   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligeren   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligerem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligeres   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   erig    rigere     [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrigere 
SFX C   erig    rigerer    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigeren    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigerem    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigeres    [^hi]erig
SFX C   0       este       [ksuxz]                              # neu > neueste 
SFX C   0       ester      [ksuxz]     
SFX C   0       esten      [ksuxz]                              # mies > miesesten 
SFX C   0       estem      [ksuxz]                              # lax > laxestem 
SFX C   0       estes      [ksuxz]                              # spitz > spitzestes 
SFX C   0       este       ss     
SFX C   0       ester      ss     
SFX C   0       esten      ss     
SFX C   0       estem      ss     
SFX C   0       estes      ss     
SFX C   0       st         et
SFX C   0       ste        et                                    # geeignet > geeignetste 
SFX C   0       ster       et     
SFX C   0       sten       et     
SFX C   0       stem       et     
SFX C   0       stes       et     
SFX C   0       est        [^e]t
SFX C   0       este       [^e]t                                 # matt > matteste 
SFX C   0       ester      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       esten      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       estem      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       estes      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       st         [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerst 
SFX C   0       ste        [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerste 
SFX C   0       ster       [^dkßstxz]                            # dick > dickster 
SFX C   0       sten       [^dkßstxz]                            # lahm > lahmsten 
SFX C   0       stem       [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerstem 
SFX C   0       stes       [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerstes 
SFX C   0       st         nd
SFX C   0       ste        nd                                    # wohlhabend > wohlhabendste 
SFX C   0       ster       nd     
SFX C   0       sten       nd     
SFX C   0       stem       nd     
SFX C   0       stes       nd     
SFX C   0       est        [^n]d
SFX C   0       este       [^n]d                                 # wild > wildeste 
SFX C   0       ester      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       esten      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       estem      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       estes      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       este       ß
SFX C   0       ester      ß
SFX C   0       esten      ß
SFX C   0       estem      ß
SFX C   0       estes      ß
SFX C   lig     eligst     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligste    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adeligste 
SFX C   lig     eligster   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligsten   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligstem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligstes   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   erig    rigst      [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigste     [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrig 
SFX C   erig    rigster    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigsten    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigstem    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigstes    [^hi]erig   


# special case for ß after short vowel
SFX c Y 10
SFX c   ß       ssere      ß
SFX c   ß       sserer     ß
SFX c   ß       sseren     ß
SFX c   ß       sserem     ß
SFX c   ß       sseres     ß
SFX c   ß       sseste     ß
SFX c   ß       ssester    ß
SFX c   ß       ssesten    ß
SFX c   ß       ssestem    ß
SFX c   ß       ssestes    ß

# a few 'catch all' plural forms: 
# All plurals seem to boil down to one of 'N', 'E', 'P' or 'Q' 
# (or are 'irregular') 
SFX E Y 1
SFX E   0       e          .


SFX N Y 1
SFX N   0       n          .


SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0       en         .
