dicts/de_DE-1901-ooe/de_DE_OLDSPELL.dic
abstoßend/AC
abtswürde/Nozm
Abwind/TPESm
Abzweigungspunkt/EPSTm
agil/AC
Ägyptenexpedition/Pm
akanthusmotiv/EPSozm
akanthusranke/Nozm
Alkylsulfid/EPSm
allergiepotential/EPSozm
Amblyopie/Nm
analfissur/Pozm
analysenzweck/EPSTozm
anfällig/C
Anhalter/FNSm
anlegerschar/Pozm
Annexionsprojekt/EPSTm
anrüchig/AC
Antisemitismusforschung/Pm
Antisemitismusvorwürfe/Nm
Antizyklon/EPSTm
arbeitnehmerfreundlich/AC
Arm/SEPTmij
Armreliquiar/EPS
Armure/Nm
artistisch/AC
Auffaßbarkeit/Pm
aufforstungsprojekt/EPSTozm
auflegematte/Nozm
aufmerksam/ACU
ausdehnbar/AC
ausgeprägt/AC
ausglitt/ZE
ausgrabungsveröffentlichung/Pozm
ausrufer/FNSozm
auswandererroman/EPSozm
automation/Pozm
Badegewässerkarte/Nm
ballaststoffreich/AC
bankrotteur/SEPFozm
bärlapp/EPSozm
Basilararterie/Nm
bedrückend/C
Begegnungsgefecht/EPSTm
Begriffsexplikation/Pm
beifällig/AC
bekenntnisfremde/Nozm
berauschend/AC
bergefahrzeug/EPSTozm
besinnlich/ACU
besitzstandsverhältnisse/Nozm
bewegend/C
bezahlsystem/EPSozm
Biegefestigkeit/Pm
bilderstürme/Nozm
blankrieb/nZE
blendgranate/Nozm
blutig/ACU
Borreliose/Nm
bowlengefäß/EPTozm
bowlingturnier/EPSozm
broiler/NSozm
brutal/ACU
burgundersoße/Nozm
capsaicinoid/EPSozm
Celluloid/EPSm
chinareise/Nozm
clean/AC
coyote/nNozm
cysteinrest/EPSTozm
Datierungseingrenzung/Pm
Deinstallationsroutine/Nm
delikat/AC
Desoxythymidin/nEPSm
Deutschordensfestung/Pm
Diakonisse/N
dickköpfig/AC
Discobesuch/EPSTm
Diskursstrategie/Nm
dispersionsindikator/PSozm
douglasie/Nozm
drängend/AC
Duellpistole/Nm
dünenschutzwerk/EPSTozm
Duopol/EPS
durstig/AC
ehrgeizig/AC
einfallsreich/AC
einmärsche/Nozm
einmündungsbereich/EPSTozm
einsichtsvoll/AC
einverdienerpaar/EPSTozm
elektronegativ/AC
Eleve/FNm
energisch/AC
Entleerungsklappe/Nm
entscheidbarkeitspostulat/EPSTozm
entzückend/AC
Enzymdefekt/EPSTm
ergonomisch/AC
erregend/C
Erz/EPTmij
Espressomaschine/Nm
ethanolfällung/Pozm
existentialistisch/AC
fachgerecht/AC
Faktormobilität/Pm
Fanal/EPSm
Färberkamille/Nm
feierlich/AC
fertigkeitsübung/Pozm
fettsäurederivat/EPSTozm
Filiale/Nm
flanschdichtung/Pozm
flatterhaft/AC
Fleischereiwerkzeug/EPSm
fockrahe/Nozm
Fossiliensammlung/Pm
Fragenkomplex/EPTm
fraulich/AC
Frühjahrsmesse/Nm
Fünfmeterplattform/Pm
furchteinflößend/AC
Fußgängerschutzweg/EPSTm
gärtnerhippe/Nozm
geestsediment/EPSozm
gefälligkeitspapier/EPSozm
gefühlsbetont/AC
Gemme/N
generell/AC
Geologiedozent/FPm
Geraniengewächs/EPTm
gesetzt/AC
Gezeitenkräfte/Nm
ghettoräumung/nPozm
giebelkreuz/EPTozm
glamourös/AC
Grabegabel/Nm
Grammgewicht/SEPTm
Grammophon/EPSm
großartig/AC
Gutschriftanzeige/Nm
Habitatverlust/EPSTm
häftlingszahl/Pozm
Hatzumer/FNS
Hebegriff/EPSm
Hefebrot/EPTm
heftig/AC
herr/FNPozm
Heteroatom/EPSm
himmelweit/AC
Historikerkreis/EPTm
hopfenzweig/EPSozm
horizontalsonde/Nozm
hydrogenkarbonat/EPSozm
ideell/AC
Idiom/EPSm
Ikonologie/N
Infanteriegarnison/Pm
Inquisitionstribunal/EPSTm
Intensivabteilung/Pm
interpolationsfehler/NSozm
intolerant/AC
isotopieeffekt/EPSozm
Jamaikakoalition/Pm
journalistenschule/Nozm
Kaliumhexacyanidoferrat/EPSm
Kaliumion/PSm
kantate/Nozm
karitativ/AC
karstgestein/EPSTozm
kasperlefigur/Pozm
Kategorie/Nm
Kiefernforst/EPSTm
kindermalwettbewerb/EPSozm
Klampfe/Nm
kleinlich/AC
Knorpelgelenk/EPSm
kohlenmonoxidgas/EPTozm
Kohlensäureester/NSm
Konfidenzintervall/EPSm
Koniferenart/Pm
Konkavgitter/NSm
kontrastreich/AC
Korporation/Pm
korrektiv/EPSozm
Kräuterkundige/Nm
kritisch/ACU
Krönungszeremoniell/EPSm
Kryptodom/EPS
kundenzufriedenheitsanalyse/Nozm
laktation/Pozm
laokoonmotiv/EPSozm
lärchenbohle/Nozm
lässig/AC
Leibgetränk/EPSm
lektürephase/Nozm
lerchensporn/EPSTozm
leuchtkräftig/AC
Linoleumstück/EPSTm
logistikexperte/Nozm
lokomotivgeräusch/EPSozm
lustreich/CV
Magnesitwerk/EPSTm
maissilage/Nozm
Malariarisikogebiet/EPSTm
Marketingorganisation/Pm
maskenkapitell/EPSTozm
Mastodynie/Nm
medienwirksam/AC
melodieteil/EPSozm
Messapier/FNS
meteor/EPSozm
Mineraliensammlung/Pm
Missionsschwester/Nm
Mistkerl/EPSm
mittelmäßig/AC
Monist/FP
Mosasaurier/NSm
Mozartfest/EPSTm
Mykorrhizapilz/EPTm
nachhaltigkeitsstrategie/Nozm
nachlaßgericht/EPSozm
nährstoffreich/AC
Nashornfund/EPSm
nerz/EPTozm
Neunzigerjahre/Nm
nitrosoverbindung/Pozm
nonchalant/AC
Nukleotid/EPSm
ochsenfrösche/Nozm
Okzipitalsyndrom/EPSm
ordnungsliebend/AC
ornithinexkretionssystem/EPSozm
Packungsdichte/Nm
palettenregal/EPSozm
Partnerschaftsmodell/EPSm
Pecher/NS
Pentagramm/EPS
pfeifenwerk/EPSTozm
pflegeleicht/AC
Phonemzahl/Pm
Phosphatbinder/NSm
Pistenfahrzeug/EPSTm
plethysmograph/Pozm
polendeutsche/Nozm
polynucleotid/EPSozm
potentialgradient/Pozm
pragmatisch/AC
Prenzlauer/NSFm
Primärtumor/EPSm
profilierungszeit/Pozm
prüde/AC
putrescinexport/EPSTozm
putrescintransport/EPSozm
putschistensender/NSozm
Ration/Pm
Rationierungsgesetz/EPTm
Räucherkammer/Nm
rechtsextrem/AC
reiberei/Pozm
Reispreis/EPTm
Rembrandtnachfolger/NSm
Reservationspreis/EPTm
reserviert/C
Revisionsziel/EPSTm
Rinderzüchter/NSFm
rodelberg/EPSozm
Rubelmillionär/EFPSm
rückständig/AC
SA-Leute/N
Sabbatgestaltung/Pm
sammlungsort/EPSTozm
schablonenmäßig/AC
schachthöhe/Nozm
Schamait/PF
Schaufelstern/dEPS
schief/AC
Schlawiner/Nm
schmerzvoll/AC
schmutzfink/PSozm
Schnelligkeitsrekord/EPSTm
schupfnudel/Nozm
schußlig/AC
sedimentprofil/EPSozm
seelsorgetelefon/EPSozm
semesterwoche/Nozm
sentimental/ACU
siebeneck/EPSozm
siebmodul/EPSozm
Sizilienreise/Nm
Sockelstift/EPSm
soldauszahlung/Pozm
speicherhungrig/AC
Spektralröhre/Nm
spitzeldienst/EPSTozm
spitzelsystem/EPSozm
Stalker/FNSm
steigerungsgrad/EPSTozm
steigungsfaktor/Pozm
stetig/ACU
stiftungshilfe/Nozm
Stratovulkan/EPS
Streiterei/Pm
substitutionsmethode/Nozm
synchronisiersignal/EPSozm
Syntaxelement/EPSm
tadellos/AC
Tasche/Nm
teilnahmegebühr/Pozm
teleobjektiv/EPSozm
theater/NSozm
thuliumverbindung/Pozm
Thyroxin/EPSm
tierfreundlich/AC
trachtenkapelle/Nozm
Trajektschiff/EPSTm
Transformationsgesetz/EPTm
treffsicher/AC
Tryptophanrest/EPSTm
Tscheche/FNm
tubulinpolymer/EPSozm
tugendreich/AC
umfassend/AC
Umstandswort/EPSTrm
unbezähmbar/AC
ungebärdig/AC
Uniformverbot/EPSTm
unsachlich/AC
unschärfe/Nozm
unvermeidlich/AC
Urdemokrat/FP
Verbandstoff/EPSTm
verblaßt/AC
vergänglich/ACU
Vergeber/NSFm
vergilhandschrift/Pozm
verständig/AC
versuch/EJPSTozm
Verwandtenmord/EPSTm
viertelsmeister/NSozm
Vorlesungsbesuch/EPSTm
vorrundenbegegnung/Pozm
waagerecht/AC
Wanderer/NSFm
wärmebeständig/AC
Wegebauinspekteur/EPSTm
Weichselvereisung/Pm
weiträumig/AC
Weseler/FNS
widersinnig/AC
Wimperg/EPST
wirkungsvoll/AC
Wochenstubenquartier/EPSm
wohlweislich/AC
würdig/ACU
Xenie/N
zeitschriftenprojekt/EPSTozm
zerfahren/AC
zertifizierungsorganisation/Pozm
zipfelmütze/Nozm
zögernd/AC
zügelschild/EPSTozm
zwangsläufig/AC
Zweiheit/P
Zwischensehne/Nm
